Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1943.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 OUTDOOR HERITAGE FUND Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the outdoor heritage fund for the fiscal year indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. The appropriations in this article are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin OUTDOOR HERITAGE FUNDnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 191,081,000 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the outdoor heritage fund. The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prairies new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 36,387,000 new text end new text begin (a) RIM Grasslands Reserve, Phase 7 new text end new text begin $2,334,000 the second year is to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat. Of this amount, $191,000 is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Ducks Unlimited and $2,143,000 is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources. Of the amount to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, up to $50,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (b) Accelerating Wildlife Management Area Program, Phase 18 new text end new text begin $4,521,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever to acquire in fee and to restore and enhance lands for wildlife management area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (c) DNR Wildlife Management Area and Scientific and Natural Area Acquisition, Phase 18 new text end new text begin $3,502,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire in fee and to restore and enhance lands for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, and to acquire land in fee for scientific and natural area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 5. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (d) Martin County DNR WMA Acquisition, Phase 10 new text end new text begin $3,017,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance strategic prairie grassland, wetland, and other wildlife habitat in Martin and Watonwan Counties for wildlife management area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, as follows: $2,363,000 to Fox Lake Conservation League, Inc.; $583,000 to Ducks Unlimited; and $71,000 to the Conservation Fund. new text end new text begin (e) Northern Tallgrass Prairie National Wildlife Refuge, Phase 16 new text end new text begin $3,087,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, to acquire land in fee or permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance lands in the Northern Tallgrass Prairie Habitat Preservation Area in western Minnesota to add to the Northern Tallgrass Prairie National Wildlife Refuge. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (f) Minnesota Prairie Recovery Program, Phase 15 new text end new text begin $3,492,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance native prairie, grasslands, wetlands, and savanna. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. Annual income statements and balance sheets for income and expenses from land acquired and held by The Nature Conservancy with this appropriation must be submitted to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council no later than 180 days after the The Nature Conservancy's fiscal year closes. new text end new text begin (g) Prairie Chicken Habitat Partnership of Southern Red River Valley, Phase 12 new text end new text begin $3,094,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever, in cooperation with the Minnesota Prairie Chicken Society, to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance lands in the southern Red River Valley for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, or to be designated and managed as waterfowl production areas in Minnesota, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. new text end new text begin (h) RIM Buffers for Wildlife and Water, Phase 12 new text end new text begin $3,744,000 the second year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and restore habitat under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.515, to protect, restore, and enhance habitat by expanding the riparian buffer program under the clean water fund for additional wildlife benefits from buffers on private land. Of this amount, up to $60,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (i) Accelerating USFWS Habitat Conservation Easement Program, Phase 6 new text end new text begin $4,509,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to restore and enhance wetland and prairie habitat on habitat easements of the United States Fish and Wildlife Service as follows: $3,019,000 to Ducks Unlimited and $1,490,000 to Pheasants Forever. new text end new text begin (j) DNR Grassland Enhancement, Phase 17 new text end new text begin $2,139,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to accelerate restoration and enhancement of prairies, grasslands, and savannas in wildlife management areas; in scientific and natural areas; in aquatic management areas; on lands in the native prairie bank; in bluff prairies on state forest land in southeastern Minnesota; and in waterfowl production areas and refuge lands of the United States Fish and Wildlife Service. new text end new text begin (k) Enhanced Public Land - Grasslands, Phase 9 new text end new text begin $2,948,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever to enhance and restore grassland and wetland habitat on public lands in the forest prairie transition, metro urban, and prairie ecoregions of Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Forests new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 36,939,000 new text end new text begin (a) Northern Forests Legacy Project new text end new text begin $25,090,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire priority forest lands in fee in St. Louis County as wildlife management areas, scientific and natural areas, state forests, and county forests. Of this amount, $12,866,000 is for an agreement with St. Louis County. new text end new text begin (b) Sand Lake and Seven Beavers Acquisition and Enhancement new text end new text begin $7,347,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy to acquire priority forest habitat lands in fee as The Nature Conservancy lands, Rajala Woods Foundation lands, state forests, and county forests. For lands held in perpetuity by The Nature Conservancy and Rajala Woods Foundation, annual income statements and balance sheets for income and expenses from land acquired with this appropriation must be submitted to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council no later than 180 days after each organization's respective fiscal year closes. new text end new text begin (c) Hardwood Hills Habitat Conservation Program, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $2,558,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance forest habitats in the hardwood hills ecological section of west-central Minnesota as follows: $90,000 to St. John's University, $354,000 to Stearns Conservation District, and $2,114,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Of the amount to Minnesota Land Trust, $252,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (d) DNR Forest Habitat Enhancement, Phase 6 new text end new text begin $1,944,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance forest wildlife habitats on public lands throughout Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Wetlands new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 33,188,000 new text end new text begin (a) Accelerating Waterfowl Production Area Acquisition Program, Phase 18 new text end new text begin $5,431,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pheasants Forever, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance wetlands and grasslands to be designated and managed as waterfowl production areas in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) RIM Wetlands - Restoring Most Productive Habitat in Minnesota, Phase 15 new text end new text begin $3,502,000 the second year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore wetlands and native grassland habitat under Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.515. Of this amount, up to $60,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (c) Shallow Lake and Wetland Protection and Restoration Program, Phase 15 new text end new text begin $6,087,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Ducks Unlimited to acquire land in fee for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, or to be designated and managed as waterfowl production areas or national wildlife refuges in Minnesota, in cooperation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, and to restore and enhance prairie lands, wetlands, and land-buffering shallow lakes. new text end new text begin (d) Wetland Habitat Protection and Restoration Program, Phase 11 new text end new text begin $3,210,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance prairie, wetland, and other habitat on permanently protected conservation easements in high-priority wetland habitat complexes in the prairie, forest/prairie transition, and forest ecoregions. Of this amount, up to $140,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (e) Living Shallow Lakes and Wetlands Enhancement and Restoration Initiative, Phase 12 new text end new text begin $6,661,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Ducks Unlimited to restore and enhance shallow lakes and wetlands on public lands and wetlands under permanent conservation easement for wildlife management. new text end new text begin (f) Talcot Lake new text end new text begin $1,000,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for the survey, design, engineering, and permitting of the Talcot Lake restoration and enhancement project in Cottonwood County. new text end new text begin (g) Roseau Lake Rehabilitation, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $3,553,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Roseau River Watershed District to restore and enhance the Roseau Lake and Roseau River habitat complex in Roseau County. The approved accomplishment plan must include an operational and management plan for the Roseau Lake Rehabilitation Project. The Roseau River Watershed District must submit to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council progress reports and a final report that include monitoring data related to water quantity and information about how flooding to adjacent and downstream agricultural lands has been addressed. No money from this appropriation may be expended: new text end new text begin (1) before January 1, 2027; or new text end new text begin (2) during any period in which a court order enjoining the project from moving forward is in effect. new text end new text begin (h) Shallow Lakes and Wetlands Enhancement, Phase 18 new text end new text begin $3,744,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to enhance and restore shallow lakes and wetland habitat statewide. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Habitats new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 82,408,000 new text end new text begin (a) Riparian Habitat Protection in Kettle and Snake River Watersheds, Phase 3 new text end new text begin $1,137,000 the second year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, in cooperation with the Pine County Soil and Water Conservation District, to acquire permanent conservation easements and restore high-quality forests, wetlands, and shoreline in the Kettle and Snake River watersheds. Of this amount, up to $70,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (b) Cannon River Watershed Habitat Restoration and Protection Program, Phase 15 new text end new text begin $2,886,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire lands in fee and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in the Cannon River Watershed as follows: $92,000 to Clean River Partners and $2,794,000 to Trust for Public Land. new text end new text begin (c) DNR Aquatic Management Area Acquisition and Trout Stream Easement Acquisition new text end new text begin $2,182,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire land in fee as aquatic management areas and to acquire permanent conservation easements to protect trout-stream aquatic habitat. Of this amount, up to $88,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (d) Washington County Habitat Protection and Enhancement Partnership, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $2,812,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitats in Washington County as follows: $760,000 to Washington County and $2,052,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Of the amount to Minnesota Land Trust, $196,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (e) Fisheries Habitat Protection on Strategic North Central Minnesota Lakes, Phase 12 new text end new text begin $2,317,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Northern Waters Land Trust to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat to sustain healthy fish habitat on coldwater lakes in Aitkin, Cass, Crow Wing, and Hubbard Counties. new text end new text begin (f) Greenbelt, Phase 1 new text end new text begin $1,467,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Comfort Lake-Forest Lake Watershed District to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat within the Comfort Lake-Forest Lake Watershed District boundary. new text end new text begin (g) Integrating Habitat and Clean Water, Phase 4 new text end new text begin $1,827,000 the second year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat identified under the One Watershed, One Plan program for stacked benefit to wildlife and clean water. Of this amount, up to $40,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (h) Metro Big Rivers, Phase 16 new text end new text begin $6,776,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance natural habitat systems associated with the Mississippi, Minnesota, and St. Croix Rivers and their tributaries in the metropolitan area as follows: $1,491,000 to Minnesota Valley National Wildlife Refuge Trust, Inc.; $892,000 to Friends of the Mississippi River; $1,055,000 to Great River Greening; and $3,338,000 to Trust for Public Land. new text end new text begin (i) Mississippi Headwaters Habitat Corridor Project, Phase 10 new text end new text begin $2,770,000 the second year is to acquire lands in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore wildlife habitat in the Mississippi headwaters. Of this amount, (1) $1,387,000 is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements as follows: $60,000 to the Mississippi Headwaters Board and $1,327,000 to Trust for Public Land; and (2) $1,383,000 is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, of which up to $70,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (j) Protecting Coldwater Fisheries on Minnesota's North Shore, Phase 4 new text end new text begin $1,695,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in priority coldwater tributaries to Lake Superior. Of this amount, up to $196,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (k) Protecting Minnesota's Lakes of Outstanding Biological Significance, Phase 5 new text end new text begin $2,983,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance lakes of outstanding biological significance in northeast and north-central Minnesota. Of this amount, $1,612,000 is to the Northern Waters Land Trust and $1,371,000 is to Minnesota Land Trust. Of the amount to Minnesota Land Trust, up to $140,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (l) Red River Basin Riparian Habitat Program, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $3,920,000 the second year is to acquire permanent conservation easements to protect, restore, and enhance stream and riparian habitat throughout the Red River watershed. Of this amount, $116,000 is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements with the Red River Watershed Management Board and $3,804,000 is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources. Of the amount to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, up to $250,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. new text end new text begin (m) Shell Rock River Watershed Habitat Restoration Program, Phase 15 new text end new text begin $2,066,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Shell Rock River Watershed District to acquire land in fee and to restore and enhance habitat in the Shell Rock River watershed. new text end new text begin (n) Southeast Minnesota Protection and Restoration, Phase 14 new text end new text begin $7,956,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in southeast Minnesota. Of this amount, $1,035,000 is to The Nature Conservancy, $5,825,000 is to Trust for Public Land, and $1,096,000 is to Minnesota Land Trust. Of the amount to Minnesota Land Trust, up to $140,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (o) St. Croix Watershed Habitat Protection and Restoration, Phase 7 new text end new text begin $3,859,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance natural habitat systems in the St. Croix River watershed as follows: $2,157,000 to Trust for Public Land, $130,000 to Wild Rivers Conservancy, and $1,572,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Of the amount to Minnesota Land Trust, up to $140,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (p) Upper Mississippi Flyway Habitat Conservation Program new text end new text begin $2,156,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wetlands, stream corridors, and associated uplands in central Minnesota. Of this amount, up to $196,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. new text end new text begin (q) A River of Birds in the Sky: Conserving Minnesota's Flyway new text end new text begin $1,227,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with National Audubon Society to restore and enhance priority wildlife habitat along the St. Croix, Minnesota, and Mississippi river valleys. new text end new text begin (r) Bone Lake South, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $1,432,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Comfort Lake-Forest Lake Watershed District to restore and enhance wildlife habitat in the Bone Lake south habitat complex in Washington County. new text end new text begin (s) DNR Aquatic Habitat Restoration and Enhancement, Phase 9 new text end new text begin $6,517,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance aquatic habitat in degraded streams and aquatic management areas and to facilitate fish passage throughout Minnesota. new text end new text begin (t) Little Cannon River Stream Habitat Restoration new text end new text begin $500,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements for survey, design, engineering, and permitting of the Little Cannon River restoration and enhancement project in Goodhue County as follows: $40,000 to Clean Rivers Partners, $10,000 to Great River Greening, and $450,000 to Trout Unlimited. new text end new text begin (u) Mission Creek Watershed Connectivity new text end new text begin $1,296,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance coldwater stream habitat in the Mission Creek watershed in St. Louis County. new text end new text begin (v) Mud River Enhancement Project new text end new text begin $2,957,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Red Lake Watershed District to restore and enhance the Mud River habitat complex in Marshall County. new text end new text begin (w) Oak Savanna Restoration for Living Landscapes new text end new text begin $1,702,000 the second year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, in partnership with the Xerces Society, to restore and enhance oak savanna and associated ecosystems on local public and Tribal lands. new text end new text begin (x) Swift Coulee Channel Restoration and Enhancement, Phase 2 new text end new text begin $2,671,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Middle-Snake-Tamarac Rivers Watershed District to restore and enhance priority habitat associated with the Swift Coulee channel restoration in Marshall County. new text end new text begin (y) Woods Creek Restoration new text end new text begin $750,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Cook County to restore and enhance coldwater stream habitat in Woods Creek in Cook County. new text end new text begin (z) Minnesota Statewide Trout Habitat Enhancement and Protection new text end new text begin $750,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Trout Unlimited for survey, design, engineering, and permitting of trout stream restoration and enhancement projects throughout Minnesota. new text end new text begin (aa) Conservation Partners Legacy Grant Program: Metro Habitat new text end new text begin $13,797,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for a program to provide competitive matching grants of up to $500,000 to local, regional, state, and national organizations for enhancing, restoring, or protecting forests, wetlands, prairies, or habitat for fish, game, or wildlife in the seven-county metropolitan area and cities with a population of 50,000 or more. Grants must not be made for activities required to fulfill the duties of owners of lands subject to conservation easements. Grants must not be made from the appropriation in this paragraph for projects that have a total project cost exceeding $1,000,000. Of the total appropriation, $600,000 may be spent for personnel costs, outreach, and support to first-time applicants and other direct and necessary administrative costs. Grantees may acquire land or interests in land. Easements must be permanent. Grants may not be used to establish easement stewardship accounts. The program must require a match of at least ten percent from nonstate sources for all grants. The match may be cash or in-kind. For grant applications of $25,000 or less, the commissioner must provide a separate, simplified application process. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 19, land acquired by fee with money appropriated in this paragraph is not required to be open to public taking of game. All restoration or enhancement projects must be on land permanently protected by a permanent covenant ensuring perpetual maintenance and protection of restored and enhanced habitat, by a conservation easement, or by public ownership or in public waters as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.005, subdivision 15. Priority must be given to restoration and enhancement projects on public lands. Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 13, applies to grants awarded under this paragraph. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. No less than five percent of the amount of each grant must be held back from reimbursement until the grant recipient completes a grant accomplishment report by the deadline and in the form prescribed by and satisfactory to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Administration new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 2,159,000 new text end new text begin (a) Contract Management new text end new text begin $450,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for contract management duties assigned in this section. The commissioner must provide an accomplishment plan in the form specified by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council on expending this appropriation. The accomplishment plan must include a copy of the grant contract template and reimbursement manual. No money may be expended before the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council approves the accomplishment plan. Money appropriated in this paragraph is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) Core Functions in Partner-led OHF Land Acquisitions new text end new text begin $1,377,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to administer the initial development, restoration, and enhancement of land acquired in fee with money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund. This appropriation may be used for land acquisition costs incurred by the Department of Natural Resources as part of conveyance of parcels to the department and initial development activities on fee title acquisitions. Money appropriated in this paragraph is available until June 30, 2034. new text end new text begin (c) Technical Evaluation Panel new text end new text begin $192,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for a technical evaluation panel to conduct up to 20 restoration and enhancement evaluations under Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 10. Money appropriated in this paragraph is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (d) Legislative Coordinating Commission new text end new text begin $140,000 the second year is to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for administrative expenses of the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council and for compensating and reimbursing expenses of council members. This appropriation is in addition to the fiscal year 2027 appropriation in Laws 2025, chapter 36, article 1, section 2, subdivision 6, paragraph (b), and is available until June 30, 2027. Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.281, applies to this appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Availability of Appropriation new text end new text begin (a) Money appropriated in this section may not be spent on activities unless they are directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation and are specified in the accomplishment plan approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. Money appropriated in this section must not be spent on indirect costs or other institutional overhead charges that are not directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation. Money appropriated for fee title acquisition of land may be used to restore, enhance, and provide for public use of the land acquired with the appropriation. Public-use facilities must have a minimal impact on habitat in acquired lands. new text end new text begin (b) Money appropriated in this section is available as follows: new text end new text begin (1) money appropriated to acquire real property is available until June 30, 2030; new text end new text begin (2) money appropriated to restore and enhance land acquired with an appropriation in this article is available for four years after the acquisition date, with a maximum end date of June 30, 2034; new text end new text begin (3) money appropriated to restore and enhance other land is available until June 30, 2031; new text end new text begin (4) notwithstanding clauses (1) to (3), money appropriated for a project that receives at least 15 percent of its funding from federal funds is available until a date sufficient to match the availability of federal funding to a maximum of six years if the federal funding was confirmed and included in the original approved draft accomplishment plan; and new text end new text begin (5) money appropriated for other projects is available until the end of the fiscal year in which it is appropriated. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Payment Conditions and Capital Equipment Expenditures new text end new text begin (a) All agreements referred to in this section must be administered on a reimbursement basis unless otherwise provided in this section. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.41, expenditures directly related to each appropriation's purpose made on or after July 1, 2026, or the date of accomplishment plan approval, whichever is later, are eligible for reimbursement unless otherwise provided in this section. For the purposes of administering appropriations and legislatively authorized agreements paid out of the outdoor heritage fund, an expense must be considered reimbursable by the administering agency when the recipient presents the agency with an invoice or a binding agreement with the landowner and the recipient attests that the goods have been received or the landowner agreement is binding. Periodic reimbursement must be made upon receiving documentation that the items articulated in the accomplishment plan approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council have been achieved, including partial achievements as evidenced by progress reports approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. Reasonable amounts may be advanced to projects to accommodate cash flow needs, support future management of acquired lands, or match a federal share. The advances must be approved as part of the accomplishment plan. Capital equipment expenditures for specific items in excess of $10,000 must be itemized in and approved as part of the accomplishment plan. new text end new text begin (b) Unless otherwise provided, no money appropriated from the outdoor heritage fund in this article may be used to acquire, restore, or enhance any real property unless the specific acquisition, restoration, or enhancement is approved as part of the accomplishment plan on the parcel list. new text end new text begin (c) Reimbursement of eligible expenses must be submitted no later than 12 months after the approval of the final report. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Mapping new text end new text begin Each direct recipient of money appropriated in this section, as well as each recipient of a grant awarded according to this section, must provide geographic information to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council for mapping any lands acquired in fee with funds appropriated in this section and open to public taking of fish and game. The commissioner of natural resources must include the lands acquired in fee with money appropriated in this section on maps showing public recreation opportunities. Maps must include information on and acknowledgment of the outdoor heritage fund, including a notation of any restrictions. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Carryforward new text end new text begin (a) The availability of the appropriation for Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 1, article 1, section 2, subdivision 5, paragraph (l), St. Louis River Restoration Initiative, Phase VIII, is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) The availability of the appropriation for Laws 2022, chapter 77, article 1, section 2, subdivision 5, paragraph (u), Daylighting Phalen Creek, is extended to June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 10 is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.056, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. (a) The Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council of 12 members is created in the legislative branch, consisting of: (1) two public members appointed by the senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration; (2) two public members appointed by the speaker of the house; (3) four public members appointed by the governor; (4) two members of the senate appointed by the senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration; and (5) two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house. (b) Members appointed under paragraph (a) must not be registered lobbyists. In making appointments, the governor, senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration, and the speaker of the house shall consider geographic balance, gender, age, ethnicity, and varying interests including hunting and fishing. The governor's appointments to the council are subject to the advice and consent of the senate. (c) Public members appointed under paragraph (a) shall have practical experience or expertise or demonstrated knowledge in the science, policy, or practice of restoring, protecting, and enhancing wetlands, prairies, forests, and habitat for fish, game, and wildlife. (d) Legislative members appointed under paragraph (a) shall include the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources finance or their designee, one member from the minority party of the senate, and one member from the minority party of the house of representatives. (e) Public members serve four-year terms. Appointed legislative members serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Public and legislative members continue to serve until their successors are appointed. Public members shall be initially appointed according to the following schedule of terms: (1) two public members appointed by the governor for a term ending the first Monday in January 2011; (2) one public member appointed by the senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration for a term ending the first Monday in January 2011; (3) one public member appointed by the speaker of the house for a term ending the first Monday in January 2011; (4) two public members appointed by the governor for a term ending the first Monday in January 2013; (5) one public member appointed by the senate Subcommittee on Committees of the Committee on Rules and Administration for a term ending the first Monday in January 2013; and (6) one public member appointed by the speaker of the house for a term ending the first Monday in January 2013. (f) Terms, compensation, and removal of public members are as provided in section 15.0575, except that a public member may be compensated at the rate of up to $125 a day. A vacancy on the council may be filled by the appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term.new text begin A public member of the council may not serve more than eight years, except a public member may serve an additional six months as necessary to fill a vacancy.new text end (g) Members shall elect a chair, vice-chair, secretary, and other officers as determined by the council. The chair may convene meetings as necessary to conduct the duties prescribed by this section. deleted text begin (h) The Legislative Coordinating Commission may appoint nonpartisan staff and contract with consultants as necessary to support the functions of the council. The council has final approval authority for the hiring of a candidate for executive director. Up to one percent of the money appropriated from the fund may be used to pay for administrative expenses of the council and for compensation and expense reimbursement of council members. deleted text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.056, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Administration; executive director. new text end new text begin (a) The Legislative Coordinating Commission may appoint nonpartisan staff and contract with consultants as necessary to support the functions of the council. new text end new text begin (b) The council has final approval authority for hiring a candidate for executive director. Notwithstanding subdivision 5, a quorum of the council may discuss, interview, and select candidates for executive director in a meeting closed to the public. new text end new text begin (c) Up to one percent of the money appropriated from the fund may be used to pay for administrative expenses of the council and for compensation and expense reimbursement of council members. new text end Sec. 5. Laws 2024, chapter 106, article 1, section 2, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Habitats -0- 101,294,000 (a) St. Croix Watershed Habitat Protection and Restoration, Phase 5 $4,711,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance natural habitat systems in the St. Croix River watershed as follows: $1,905,000 to Trust for Public Land; $110,000 to Wild Rivers Conservancy; and $2,696,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $224,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. (b) Pine and Leech Watershed Targeted RIM Easement Permanent Land Protection, Phase 3 $2,242,000 the second year is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, in cooperation with the Crow Wing County Soil and Water Conservation District, to acquire permanent conservation easements of high-quality forest, wetland, and shoreline habitat. Up to $120,000 of the total amount is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. (c) Protecting Minnesota's Lakes of Outstanding Biological Significance, Phase 3 $3,321,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance lakes of outstanding biological significance in northeast and north-central Minnesota. Of this amount, $1,083,000 is to the Northern Waters Land Trust and $2,238,000 is to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $224,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. (d) Shell Rock River Watershed Habitat Restoration Program, Phase 13 $2,060,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Shell Rock River Watershed District to acquire land in fee and restore and enhance habitat in the Shell Rock River watershed. (e) Cannon River Watershed Habitat Restoration and Protection Program, Phase 13 $2,555,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire lands in fee and restore and enhance wildlife habitat in the Cannon River watershed as follows: $54,000 to Clean River Partners; $888,000 to Great River Greening; and $1,613,000 to Trust for Public Land. (f) Mississippi Headwaters Habitat Corridor Project, Phase 8 $2,706,000 the second year is to acquire lands in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore wildlife habitat in the Mississippi headwaters. Of this amount: (1) $1,706,000 is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements as follows: $57,000 to the Mississippi Headwaters Board and $1,649,000 to Trust for Public Land; and (2) $1,000,000 is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources, of which up to $100,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. (g) Fisheries Habitat Protection on Strategic North Central Minnesota Lakes, Phase 10 $2,687,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and in permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat to sustain healthy fish habitat on coldwater lakes in Aitkin, Cass, Crow Wing, and Hubbard Counties as follows: $2,252,000 to Northern Waters Land Trust and $435,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $56,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. (h) Red River Basin Riparian Habitat Program $5,119,000 the second year is to acquire permanent conservation easements to protect, restore, and enhance stream and riparian habitat throughout the Red River watershed. Of this amount, $169,000 is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Red River Watershed Management Board and $4,950,000 is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources. Up to $380,000 of the total amount is for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. (i) Resilient Habitat for Heritage Brook Trout, Phase 2 $2,486,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance habitat in targeted watersheds of southeast Minnesota to improve heritage brook trout and coldwater aquatic communities. Of this amount, $400,000 is to The Nature Conservancy, $612,000 is to Trout Unlimited, and $1,474,000 is to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. (j) Southeast Minnesota Protection and Restoration, Phase 12 $3,052,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire lands in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance wildlife habitat on public lands and permanent conservation easements in southeast Minnesota as follows: $970,000 to The Nature Conservancy, $964,000 to Trust for Public Land, and $1,118,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $112,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. (k) Lower Wild Rice River Corridor Habitat Restoration, Phase 4 $2,345,000 the second year is to acquire land in permanent conservation easement and to restore river and related habitat in the Wild Rice River corridor. Of this amount, $30,000 is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Wild Rice Watershed District and $2,315,000 is to the Board of Water and Soil Resources. The Board of Water and Soil Resources may use up to $60,000 for establishing a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. Subdivision 8, paragraph (b), does not apply to this project. A list of permanent conservation easements must be provided as part of the final report. (l) DNR Wildlife Management Area and Scientific and Natural Area Acquisition, Phase 16 $1,359,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to acquire in fee and restore and enhance lands for wildlife management purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 8, and to acquire land in fee for scientific and natural area purposes under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05, subdivision 5. Subject to evaluation criteria in Minnesota Rules, part 6136.0900, priority must be given to acquiring lands that are eligible for the native prairie bank under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.96, or lands adjacent to protected native prairie. (m) Accelerating Habitat Conservation in Southwest Minnesota, Phase 3 $2,872,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to acquire permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance high-quality wildlife habitat in southwest Minnesota. Of this amount, up to $168,000 is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. (n) Sauk River Watershed Habitat Protection and Restoration, Phase 5 $3,965,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire lands in fee and permanent conservation easements and restore and enhance wildlife habitat in the Sauk River watershed as follows: $375,000 to Great River Greening; $1,199,000 to Sauk River Watershed District; $1,192,000 to Pheasants Forever; and $1,199,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $168,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. (o) Metro Big Rivers, Phase 14 $8,123,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to acquire land in fee and permanent conservation easements and to restore and enhance natural habitat systems associated with the Mississippi, Minnesota, and St. Croix Rivers and their tributaries within the metropolitan area as follows: $1,250,000 to Minnesota Valley National Wildlife Refuge Trust, Inc.; $420,000 to Friends of the Mississippi River; $803,000 to Great River Greening; $2,750,000 to Trust for Public Land; and $2,900,000 to Minnesota Land Trust. Up to $224,000 to Minnesota Land Trust is to establish a monitoring and enforcement fund as approved in the accomplishment plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 17. (p) Anoka Sand Plain Habitat Conservation, Phase 9 $1,802,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for agreements to restore and enhance wildlife habitat on public lands and easements in the Anoka Sand Plain ecoregion and intersecting minor watersheds as follows: $1,508,000 to Great River Greening and $294,000 to Sherburne County. (q) DNR Aquatic Habitat Restoration and Enhancement, Phase 7 $4,206,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance aquatic habitat in degraded streams and aquatic management areas and to facilitate fish passage. (r) Minnesota Statewide Trout Habitat Enhancement $2,308,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Trout Unlimited to restore and enhance habitat for trout and other species in and along coldwater rivers, lakes, and streams throughout Minnesota. (s) Knife River Habitat Rehabilitation, Phase 7 $1,572,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Arrowhead Regional Development Commission, in cooperation with the Lake Superior Steelhead Association, to restore and enhance trout habitat in the Knife River watershed. If the Arrowhead Regional Development Commission declines to serve as the fiscal agent for the project, an alternative fiscal agent must be identified in the accomplishment plan for the project. (t) DNR St. Louis River Restoration Initiative, Phase 11 $2,163,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to restore and enhance priority aquatic, riparian, and forest habitats in the St. Louis River estuary. Of this amount, $716,000 is for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust. (u) Roseau Lake Rehabilitation, Phase 2 $3,054,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Roseau River Watershed District to restore and enhance the Roseau Lake and Roseau River habitat complex in Roseau County, Minnesota. (v) Highbanks Ravine Bat Hibernaculum $2,300,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of St. Cloud to enhance the Highbanks Ravine Bat Hibernaculum in St. Cloud. (w) Owámniyomni Native Landscape and River Restoration, St. Anthony Falls $1,918,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Friends of the Falls to restore and enhance wildlife habitat at Upper St. Anthony Falls. This appropriation may only be spent for site grading, oak savanna, and aquatic habitat portions of the project. (x) Silver Lake Dam Fish Passage Modification $2,368,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of Rochester to restore and enhance aquatic habitat in Silver Lake and the south fork of the Zumbro River by modifying the existing low-head dam in Rochester. (y) Little Devil Track River Restoration $3,000,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Cook County to restore and enhance stream habitat in the Little Devil Track River. (z) Conservation Partners Legacy Grant Program: Statewide and Metro Habitat, Phase 16 $15,000,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources for a program to provide competitive matching grants of up to $500,000 to local, regional, state, and national organizations for enhancing, restoring, or protecting forests, wetlands, prairies, or habitat for fish, game, or wildlife in Minnesota. Unless there are not enough eligible grant applications received, of this amount, at least $4,000,000 is for grants in the seven-county metropolitan area and cities with a population of 50,000 or more and at least $4,000,000 is for grants to applicants that have not previously applied for money from the outdoor heritage fund. Grants must not be made for activities required to fulfill the duties of owners of lands subject to conservation easements. Grants must not be made from the appropriation in this paragraph for projects that have a total project cost exceeding $1,000,000. Of the total appropriation, $600,000 may be spent for personnel costs, outreach, and support to first-time applicants and other direct and necessary administrative costs. Grantees may acquire land or interests in land. Easements must be permanent. Grants may not be used to establish easement stewardship accounts. The program must require a match of at least ten percent from nonstate sources for all grants. The match may be cash or in-kind. For grant applications of $25,000 or less, the commissioner must provide a separate, simplified application process. Subject to Minnesota Statutes, the commissioner of natural resources must, when evaluating projects of equal value, give priority to organizations that have a history of receiving, or a charter to receive, private contributions for local conservation or habitat projects. All restoration or enhancement projects must be on land permanently protected by a permanent covenant ensuring perpetual maintenance and protection of restored and enhanced habitat, by a conservation easement, or by public ownership or in public waters as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.005, subdivision 15. Priority must be given to restoration and enhancement projects on public lands. Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.056, subdivision 13, applies to grants awarded under this paragraph. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. No less than five percent of the amount of each grant must be held back from reimbursement until the grant recipient completes a grant accomplishment report by the deadline and in the form prescribed by and satisfactory to the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council. The commissioner must provide notice of the grant program in the summary of game and fish law prepared under Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.051, subdivision 2. (aa) Protecting Upper Mississippi River from Invasive Carp $12,000,000 the second year is to the commissioner of natural resources to fund activities to protect the upper Mississippi River from invasive carp. Activities within this appropriation include agreements with federal partners, such as the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, to design, construct, and begin operating and maintaining a structural deterrent for invasive carp at Lock and Dam No. 5 on the Mississippi River to protect Minnesota's aquatic habitat through an adaptive management approach. Deterrent design must be fully completed deleted text begin within two years of the date of this appropriationdeleted text end new text begin by June 30, 2027new text end . Deterrent installation must be completed by June 30, 2029. Money not spent or obligated for design installation and operation of the deterrent may be used for testing technologies to support the future effectiveness of the deterrent. A detailed accomplishment plan must be submitted to and approved by the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council before money is released. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. Sec. 6. new text begin LESSARD-SAMS OUTDOOR HERITAGE COUNCIL; TRANSITION.new text end new text begin Section 3 is effective July 1, 2026, and applies to appointments of public members of the Lessard-Sams Outdoor Heritage Council made on or after that date. Years served on the council before July 1, 2026, count toward the limits imposed by section 3. Members appointed before July 1, 2026, may serve out the remainder of their terms if their service has exceeded the term limits imposed by section 3. new text end ARTICLE 2 PARKS AND TRAILS FUND Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.536, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Districts; plans and hearings. (a) The commissioner of natural resources, in consultation with the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Coalition, shall establish six regional parks and trails districts in the state encompassing the area outside the seven-county metropolitan area. The commissioner shall establish districts by combining counties and may not assign a county to more than one district. (b) The commission shall develop a strategic plan and criteria for determining parks and trails of regional significance that are eligible for funding from the parks and trails fund and meet the criteria under subdivision 6. (c) Counties within each district may jointly prepare, after consultation with all affected municipalities, and submit to the commission, and from time to time revise and resubmit to the commission, a master plan for the acquisition and development of parks and trails of regional significance located within the district. deleted text begin Districtwide plans and master plans for individual parks and trails must meet the protocols and criteria as set forth in the greater Minnesota regional parks and trails strategic plan. The counties, after consultation with the commission, shall jointly hold a public hearing on the proposed plan and budget at a time and place determined by the counties. Not less than 15 days before the hearing, the counties shall provide notice of the hearing stating the date, time, and place of the hearing and the place where the proposed plan and budget may be examined by any interested person. At any hearing, interested persons shall be permitted to present their views on the plan and budget.deleted text end (d) The commission shall review each master plan to determine whether it meets the conditions of subdivision 6. If it does not, the commission shall return the plan with its comments to the district for revision and resubmittal. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.536, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Recommendations. (a) In recommending grants under this section, the commission shall make recommendations consistent with master plans. (b) The commission shall determine recommended grant amounts through an adopted merit-based evaluation process that includes the level of local financial support. The evaluation process is not subject to the rulemaking provisions of chapter 14, and section 14.386 does not apply. (c) When recommending grants, the commission shall consider balance of the grant benefits across greater Minnesota. (d) Grants may be recommended only for deleted text begin parks and trailsdeleted text end new text begin projectsnew text end included in a plan approved by the commission under subdivision 5. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.536, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Chair. The commission shall deleted text begin annuallydeleted text end new text begin bienniallynew text end elect from among its members a chair and other officers necessary for the performance of its duties. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.536, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Report. The commission shall submit a report by January 15 each year listing its recommendationsnew text begin by regional parks and trails districtnew text end under subdivision 7deleted text begin , in priority order,deleted text end to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees of the senate and house of representatives with primary jurisdiction over legacy appropriations. Sec. 5. new text begin PARKS AND TRAILS FUND APPROPRIATION EXTENSIONS.new text end new text begin (a) The availability of the grant to the St. Louis and Lake Counties Regional Railroad Authority for the Mesabi Trail project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) The availability of the grant to Olmsted County for the Oxbow Park and Zollman Zoo project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (c) The availability of the grant to Stearns County for the Kraemer Lake and Wildwood County Park project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (d) The availability of the grant to Redwood County for the Plum Creek Park project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2024 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (e) The availability of the grant to the city of Sandstone for the Robinson Quarry Park project from the parks and trails fund fiscal year 2025 appropriation under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (c), is extended to June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (f) The availability of the appropriations for coordination and projects between partners from the parks and trails fund in fiscal years 2024 and 2025 under Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 3, section 3, paragraph (f), is extended to June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.536, subdivisions 3 and 4, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end ARTICLE 3 ARTS AND CULTURAL HERITAGE FUND Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 40, article 4, section 2, subdivision 6, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 36, article 4, section 15, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Department of Administration 17,040,000 14,105,000 (a) The amounts in this subdivision are appropriated to the commissioner of administration for grants to the named organizations for the purposes specified in this subdivision. The commissioner of administration may use a portion of this appropriation for costs that are directly related to and necessary for the administration of grants in this subdivision. (b) Grant agreements entered into by the commissioner and recipients of appropriations under this subdivision must ensure that money appropriated in this subdivision is used to supplement and not substitute for traditional sources of funding. (c) Minnesota Public Radio $2,050,000 each year is for Minnesota Public Radio to create programming and expand news service on Minnesota's cultural heritage and history. (d) Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations $2,050,000 the first year and $2,050,000 the second year are to the Association of Minnesota Public Educational Radio Stations for production and acquisition grants in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.19. (e) Public Television $5,000,000 the first year and $4,500,000 the second year are to the Minnesota Public Television Association for production and acquisition grants according to Minnesota Statutes, section 129D.18. Of the amount in the first year, $1,000,000 is for producing Minnesota military and veterans' history stories and unique immigrant stories from around the state. (f) Wilderness Inquiry $500,000 the first year and $600,000 the second year are to Wilderness Inquiry to preserve Minnesota's outdoor history, culture, and heritage by connecting Minnesota youth and families to natural resources. (g) Como Park Zoo $1,725,000 each year is to the Como Park Zoo and Conservatory for program development that features educational programs and habitat enhancement, special exhibits, music appreciation programs, and historical garden access and preservation. (h) Science Museum of Minnesota $825,000 each year is to the Science Museum of Minnesota for arts, arts education, and arts access and to preserve Minnesota's history and cultural heritage, including student and teacher outreach, statewide educational initiatives, and community-based exhibits that preserve Minnesota's history and cultural heritage. (i) Appetite for Change $200,000 the first year is to the nonprofit Appetite for Change for the Community Cooks programming, which will preserve the cultural heritage of growing and cooking food in Minnesota. (j) Lake Superior Zoo $150,000 each year is to the Lake Superior Zoo to develop educational exhibits and programs. (k) Great Lakes Aquarium $250,000 each year is to the Lake Superior Center Authority to prepare, fabricate, and install a hands-on exhibit with interactive learning components to educate Minnesotans on the history of the natural landscape of the state. (l) State Band $25,000 the first year and $25,000 the second year are to the Minnesota state band to provide free concerts throughout the state. (m) Veterans Memorial Park in Wyoming $100,000 the first year is for a grant to the city of Wyoming to build the Veterans Memorial Plaza and related interpretive walk in Railroad Park. (n) Great Northern Festival $75,000 the first year and $75,000 the second year are for a grant to support the Great Northern Festival, which connects attendees to parks, outdoor spaces, and cultural venues through a festival. (o) Governor's Council on Developmental Disabilities $50,000 the first year is to the Minnesota Governor's Council on Developmental Disabilities to continue to preserve and raise awareness of the history of Minnesotans with developmental disabilities. (p) Minnesota Council on Disability $125,000 the first year and $125,000 the second year are to the Minnesota Council on Disability to provide educational opportunities in the arts, history, and cultural heritage of Minnesotans with disabilities in conjunction with the 50th anniversary of the Minnesota Council on Disability. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (q) Keller Regional Park $500,000 the first year is for a grant to Ramsey County to preserve Minnesota's cultural heritage by enhancing the tuj lub courts at Keller Regional Park. (r) Vietnam War Anniversary $250,000 the first year is for a grant to the commissioner of veterans affairs to prepare and host a commemoration program for the 50th anniversary of the Vietnam War. (s) St. Paul Cultural Art Installation $500,000 the first year is for a grant to deleted text begin Forecast Public Art for andeleted text end new text begin the city of St. Paul for a publicnew text end art installation celebrating Olympic gold medalist Suni Lee. The project funded by this paragraph must be located in St. Paul at the Conway Recreation Center or, if that site is not practicable, at Lake Phalen at the platform containing the bust of Suni Lee. This appropriation is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . (t) One Heartland Center $50,000 each year is for a grant to One Heartland Center for programming and outdoor activities for families and youth in Minnesota. (u) Forest Lake Veterans Memorial $100,000 the first year is for a grant to the Forest Lake Veterans Memorial Committee to construct a memorial to veterans of the United States armed forces at Lakeside Memorial Park in the city of Forest Lake. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (v) Hmong Plaza $450,000 the first year is for a grant to the city of St. Paul to construct the Hmong Plaza at Phalen Lake. (w) Camille Gage Artist Fellowship $55,000 the first year and $55,000 the second year are for a grant to YWCA Minneapolis to fund an annual fellowship to be known as the Camille J. Gage Artist Fellowship. Of this amount, up to $5,000 each year may be used for administrative expenses. YWCA Minneapolis must select a person for the Camille J. Gage Artist Fellowship after an application process that allows both applications by interested persons and nominations of persons by third parties. By October 1, 2026, YWCA Minneapolis must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over legacy on the use of money appropriated under this paragraph and on the activities of the person selected for the Camille J. Gage Artist Fellowship under this paragraph. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2026. (x) Minnesota African American Heritage Museum and Gallery $235,000 the first year and $125,000 the second year are for arts and cultural heritage programming celebrating African American and Black communities in Minnesota. Of the amount in the first year, $110,000 is for C. Caldwell Fine Arts for an outdoor mural project in North Minneapolis to work with young people to develop skills while using art as the impetus. (y) Tibetan American Foundation of Minnesota $25,000 the first year and $25,000 the second year are for a grant to the Tibetan American Foundation of Minnesota to celebrate and teach the art, culture, and heritage of Tibetan Americans in Minnesota. (z) Hong De Wu Guan $25,000 the first year is for a grant to Hong De Wu Guan to create cultural arts projects like Lion Dance for after-school programs for youth. (aa) Sepak Takraw of USA $50,000 the first year is for a grant to the Sepak Takraw of USA to work with youth and after-school programs in the community to teach the cultural games of tuj lub and sepak takraw. This appropriation may not be used to hold events. (bb) 30,000 Feet $75,000 the first year and $75,000 the second year are for a grant to 30,000 Feet, a nonprofit organization, to help youth and community artists further develop their artistic skills, to create community art and artistic performances, and to promote and share African American history and culture through the arts. (cc) Siengkane Lao Minnesota $50,000 the first year and $50,000 the second year are for a grant to Siengkane Lao MN to create cultural arts projects and to preserve traditional performances. (dd) Hmong Cultural Center $150,000 the first year and $150,000 the second year are for a grant to the Hmong Cultural Center of Minnesota for museum-related programming and educational outreach activities to teach the public about the historical, cultural, and folk arts heritage of Hmong Minnesotans. (ee) Comunidades Latinas Unidas En Servicio $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are for a grant to Comunidades Latinas Unidas En Servicio (CLUES) to expand arts programming to celebrate Latino cultural heritage; support local artists; and provide professional development, networking, and presentation opportunities. (ff) Hmong RPA Writing System $300,000 the first year and $300,000 the second year are for grants to recipients who have demonstrated knowledge and interest in preserving Hmong culture to preserve Hmong Minnesotans' heritage, history, language, and culture. Grants must be used in conjunction with Minnesota universities to improve and develop a unified and standardized Latin alphabet form of the Hmong RPA writing system. No portion of this appropriation may be used to encourage religious membership or to conduct personal ceremonies or events. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. (gg) Somali Museum of Minnesota $125,000 the first year and $125,000 the second year are for a grant to the Somali Museum of Minnesota for heritage arts and cultural vitality programs to provide classes, exhibits, presentations, and outreach about the Somali community and heritage in Minnesota. (hh) Minnesota Museum of American Art $200,000 the first year and $200,000 the second year are for a grant to the Minnesota Museum of American Art for exhibit programming and for a Native American Fellowship at the museum. (ii) Fanka Programs $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are for a grant to Ka Joog statewide Somali-based collaborative programs for arts and cultural heritage. The funding must be used for Fanka programs to provide arts education and workshops, mentor programs, and community presentations and community engagement events throughout Minnesota. (jj) The Bakken Museum $150,000 the first year is for a grant to The Bakken Museum for interactive exhibits and outreach programs on arts and cultural heritage. (kk) 4-H Shooting Sports $50,000 the first year is to the University of Minnesota Extension Office to provide grants to Minnesota 4-H chapters that have members participating in state and national 4-H-sanctioned shooting sports events. Eligible costs for grant money include shooting sports equipment and supplies and event fees associated with participating in state shooting sports events. (ll) Public Art Saint Paul $75,000 each year is for a grant to Public Art Saint Paul for art programming at the Wakpa Triennial Art Festival to showcase new art across the Twin Cities by Minnesota artists in outdoor and indoor settings and to encourage visitors to experience the arts and culture produced by local arts and culture organizations. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 4 STATE LANDS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.0272, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Acquisition procedure. When the commissioner of natural resources is authorized to acquire deleted text begin lands or interests in landsdeleted text end new text begin fee title or an easement interest in land,new text end the procedure set forth in this section deleted text begin shall applydeleted text end new text begin appliesnew text end . The commissioner of natural resources shall first prepare a fact sheet showing the lands to be acquired, the legal authority for their acquisition, and the qualities of the land that make it a desirable acquisition. The commissioner of natural resources shall cause the lands to be appraised. An appraiser shall before entering upon the duties of office take and subscribe an oath to faithfully and impartially discharge the duties as appraiser according to the best of the appraiser's ability and that the appraiser is not interested directly or indirectly in any of the lands to be appraised or the timber or improvements thereon or in the sale thereof and has entered into no agreement or combination to purchase the same or any part thereof, which oath shall be attached to the report of the appraisal. The commissioner of natural resources may pay less than the appraised value, but shall not agree to pay more than ten percent above the appraised value, except that if the commissioner pays less than the appraised value for a parcel of land, the difference between the purchase price and the appraised value may be used to apply to purchases at more than the appraised value. The sum of accumulated differences between appraised amounts and purchases for more than the appraised amount may not exceed the sum of accumulated differences between appraised amounts and purchases for less than the appraised amount. New appraisals may be made at the discretion of the commissioner of natural resources. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.0272, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Stream easements. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 1, the commissioner may acquire permanent stream easements for angler access, fish management, and habitat work new text begin and easements to access permanent stream easements acquired under this subdivision new text end for a onetime payment based on a value attributed to deleted text begin bothdeleted text end the stream deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end the easement corridornew text begin , and any access easementnew text end . The payment deleted text begin shall equaldeleted text end new text begin equalsnew text end : (1) the per linear foot of stream within the easement corridor times $5; plus (2) the easement corridor acres times the estimated market valuedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; plusnew text end new text begin (3) the access corridor acres times the estimated market value. new text end (b) The estimated market value is equal to: (1) the agricultural market value plus the rural vacant market value plus the managed forest market value; divided by (2) the acres of agricultural land plus the rural vacant land plus the managed forest land. (c) The agricultural market value, rural vacant market value, and managed forest market value or equivalent are determined from data collected by the Department of Revenue during its annual spring mini abstract survey. If the Department of Revenue changes its property type groups for its annual spring mini abstract survey, the agricultural market value, the rural vacant market value, and the managed forest market value shall be determined by the commissioner from data collected by the Department of Revenue in a manner that provides the most reasonable substitute for the market values as presently reported. The commissioner must use the most recent available data for the city or township within which the easement corridor is located. (d) The commissioner shall periodically review the easement payment rates under this subdivision to determine whether the stream easement payments reflect current shoreland market values. If the commissioner determines that the easements do not reflect current shoreland market values, the commissioner shall report to the senate and house of representatives natural resources policy committees with recommendations for changes to this subdivision that are necessary for the stream easement payment rates to reflect current shoreland market values. The recommendations may include an adjustment to the dollar amount in paragraph (a), clause (1). Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.96, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Access easement. new text end new text begin The commissioner may acquire easements to access native prairie acquired under this section. The commissioner may pay the landowner or land administrator for access easements an amount equal to or less than 50 percent of the payment rate under subdivision 5. new text end Sec. 4. Laws 2024, chapter 90, article 1, section 52, is amended to read: Sec. 52. EFFECTIVE DATE. new text begin (a) new text end Sections deleted text begin 1 to 51deleted text end new text begin 4, 7, 10 to 12, 14 to 17, and 19 to 51, and the amendments to Minnesota Rules, parts 6100.5002, 6213.0100, 6213.0400, 6213.0500, 6232.0200, 6232.0300, 6232.0400, 6232.0500, 6232.0900, 6232.1250, 6232.1300, 6232.1600, 6232.1950, 6232.1970, 6232.1980, 6232.2550, 6232.2800, 6232.3100, 6232.4400, 6234.1600, 6234.1700, 6234.2000, 6234.2600, 6236.0300, 6236.0500, 6236.0950, 6237.0200, 6262.1000, 6262.3200, 6264.0400, and 6266.0700, and the repealer as adopted by the commissioner of natural resources and published in the State Register, volume 49, page 1416, June 30, 2025,new text end are effective upon full implementation of the replacement electronic licensenew text begin , permits, and pass portions of the electronic licensenew text end system. new text begin (b) Sections 5, 6, 8, 9, 13, and 18 are effective upon full implementation of the vehicle registration portions of the electronic license system. new text end new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner of natural resources must notify the revisor of statutes when the deleted text begin replacement electronic license system is fully implemented.deleted text end new text begin portions of the replacement electronic licensing system governed by the sections and rule modifications described in paragraph (a) are fully implemented and when the portions of the replacement electronic licensing system governed by the sections described in paragraph (b) are fully implemented.new text end Sec. 5. new text begin ADDITIONS TO STATE PARKS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin [85.012] [Subd. 21.] Frontenac State Park, Goodhue County. new text end new text begin The following area is added to Frontenac State Park: Lot 3, Block 1, VILLA MARIA ADDITION, according to the recorded plat thereof, Goodhue County, Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin [85.012] [Subd. 24a.] Great River Bluffs State Park, Winona County. new text end new text begin The following area is added to Great River Bluffs State Park: the West Half of the Southeast Quarter of the Northeast Quarter, Section 33, Township 106 North, Range 5 West, Winona County, Minnesota. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin DELETION FROM STATE PARK.new text end new text begin [85.012] [Subd. 42.] Mille Lacs Kathio State Park, Mille Lacs County. The following area is deleted from Mille Lacs Kathio State Park: that part of Government Lot 3, Section 33, Township 43 North, Range 27 West, Mille Lacs County, Minnesota, lying easterly of the easterly right-of-way line of U.S. Trunk Highway 169. Excepting therefrom the following described tract of land: commencing at the northwest corner of said Government Lot 3, said corner being marked by a 2-½-inch aluminum post with brass cap (Bureau of Land Management Monument); thence North 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds East, assumed bearing, along the north line of said Government Lot 3, a distance of 1,076.85 feet to the point of beginning of the land to be described; thence continuing North 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds East, along said north line, a distance of 40.88 feet to a ¾-inch iron rod with disk stamped MN DNR PROPERTY; thence continuing North 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds East, along said north line, a distance of 299.64 feet to a ¾-inch rebar with plastic cap stamped MN DNR LS 47461; thence South 14 degrees 26 minutes 27 seconds East, a distance of 170.18 feet to a ¾-inch iron rod with disk stamped MN DNR PROPERTY; thence South 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds West, a distance of 413.14 feet to a ¾-inch iron rod; thence continuing South 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds West, a distance of 10.50 feet; thence North 07 degrees 53 minutes 17 seconds East, a distance of 70.68 feet; thence North 18 degrees 01 minute 43 seconds East, a distance of 100.09 feet to the point of beginning. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin PUBLIC SALE OF SURPLUS LAND BORDERING PUBLIC WATER; BECKER COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 92.45, the commissioner of natural resources may sell by public sale the surplus land bordering public water that is described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may make necessary changes to the legal description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land that may be sold is located in Becker County and is described as: all that part of Government Lot 1, Section 9, Township 138 North, Range 43 West, Becker County, Minnesota, bounded by the water's edge of Rossman Lake and the following described lines: commencing at meander corner No. 17 located at the northwesterly corner of said Government Lot 1; thence North 89 degrees 00 minutes 00 seconds East on an assumed bearing 98.96 feet on and along the north line of said Section 9; thence South 10 degrees 10 minutes 30 seconds East, 233.06 feet to a point on the centerline of a township road and the point of beginning; thence South 10 degrees 10 minutes 30 seconds East, 355.37 feet on and along the centerline of said township road; thence South 87 degrees 05 minutes 10 seconds East, 33.46 feet to the northwesterly corner of Erickson Shores, a plat recorded in the Office of the Register of Deeds, Becker County; thence South 87 degrees 05 minutes 10 seconds East, 443.59 feet on and along the north line of said plat to the northwesterly corner of Lot 1 of Block 1 of said plat; thence North 58 degrees 09 minutes 38 seconds East, 135 feet, more or less, on and along the north line of said Lot 1 of Block 1 to the water's edge of said Rossman Lake and there terminating. And also, from the point of beginning; thence North 88 degrees 40 minutes 54 seconds East, 263 feet, more or less, to the water's edge of Rossman Lake and there terminating. Including all riparian rights to the contained 4.3 acres, more or less, and subject to all existing easements. new text end new text begin (d) The land borders Rossman Lake and is not contiguous to other state lands. The Department of Natural Resources has determined that the land is not needed for natural resource purposes and that the state's land management interests would best be served if the land was returned to private ownership. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF SURPLUS LAND BORDERING PUBLIC WATER; MILLE LACS COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 92.45, 94.09, and 94.10, the commissioner of natural resources may sell by private sale the surplus land bordering public water that is described in paragraph (c) to a federally recognized Indian Tribe, subject to the state's reservation of access and dam easements over the land described in paragraph (c) if the state elects to reserve such easements. new text end new text begin (b) The land must not be sold for less than the appraised value. The buyer must reimburse the commissioner for all costs and expenses, including staff costs, incurred by the commissioner in making the property salable and in selling the property. The commissioner may make necessary changes to the legal description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land that may be sold is all of or a portion of the land located in Mille Lacs County and described as: that part of Government Lot 3, Section 33, Township 43 North, Range 27 West, Mille Lacs County, Minnesota, lying easterly of the easterly right-of-way line of U.S. Trunk Highway 169. Excepting therefrom the following described tract of land: commencing at the northwest corner of said Government Lot 3, said corner being marked by a 2-½-inch aluminum post with brass cap (Bureau of Land Management Monument); thence North 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds East, assumed bearing, along the north line of said Government Lot 3, a distance of 1,076.85 feet to the point of beginning of the land to be described; thence continuing North 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds East, along said north line, a distance of 40.88 feet to a ¾-inch iron rod with disk stamped MN DNR PROPERTY; thence continuing North 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds East, along said north line, a distance of 299.64 feet to a ¾-inch rebar with plastic cap stamped MN DNR LS 47461; thence South 14 degrees 26 minutes 27 seconds East, a distance of 170.18 feet to a ¾-inch iron rod with disk stamped MN DNR PROPERTY; thence South 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds West, a distance of 413.14 feet to a ¾-inch iron rod; thence continuing South 89 degrees 43 minutes 55 seconds West, a distance of 10.50 feet; thence North 07 degrees 53 minutes 17 seconds East, a distance of 70.68 feet; thence North 18 degrees 01 minute 43 seconds East, a distance of 100.09 feet to the point of beginning. new text end new text begin (d) The land to be sold borders on Mille Lacs Lake. The Department of Natural Resources has determined that the state's land management interests would best be served if the land was conveyed to a federally recognized Indian Tribe. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OF SURPLUS LAND BORDERING PUBLIC WATER; PINE COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 92.45, 94.09, and 94.10, the commissioner of natural resources may convey by private sale the surplus land bordering public water that is described in paragraph (c) for no consideration, subject to the state's reservation of an access easement over the land described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may make necessary changes to the legal description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land that may be conveyed is located in Pine County and is described as: that part of the West 105 feet of the West 205 feet of that part of Lot 48, Auditor's Subdivision of Section 24, Township 41, Range 21, Pine County, Minnesota, lying South of a line described as follows: commencing at a point on the west line of said Lot 48, 570 feet South of the northwest corner of said lot; thence southeasterly to a point in the east line of said Lot 48, midway between the northeast corner and the southeast corner of said lot, and lying North of the northerly water's edge of the North Branch of the Grindstone River, including all riparian rights. new text end new text begin (d) The land borders the Grindstone River. The Department of Natural Resources has determined that the conveyance will ensure that the private landowners have continued access to the Grindstone River after the Grindstone River dam is removed and the channel restored to a natural alignment. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin CONVEYANCE OF SURPLUS STATE LAND; REDWOOD COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 16B.281 to 16B.298, or any other law to the contrary, upon approval by the Minnesota Historical Society's Executive Council, the director of the Minnesota Historical Society may convey to the Lower Sioux Indian Community in the state of Minnesota, for no consideration, the surplus land and real property described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The Minnesota Historical Society may make necessary changes to the legal description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be conveyed is located in Redwood County and is described as: Tract "C" that part of the Northeast Quarter of the Northwest Quarter of Section 8, Township 112, Range 34, Redwood County, Minnesota, lying southerly of the centerline of CSAH 2 as shown on Redwood County Right of Way Plat No. 3 C.S.A.H. Number 2 as of public record, Redwood County, Minnesota. new text end new text begin (d) The Minnesota Historical Society has determined that the state's land management interests and interpretive program interests would best be served if portions of the Lower Sioux Agency Historic Site were conveyed to the Lower Sioux Indian Community in the state of Minnesota. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF TAX-FORFEITED LAND; ST. LOUIS COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the public sale provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282, or other law to the contrary, St. Louis County may sell by private sale the tax-forfeited land described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The conveyance must be in a form approved by the attorney general. The attorney general may make changes to the land description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be sold is located in St. Louis County and is described as: new text end new text begin Government Lot 2, EXCEPT the South 760 feet; AND EXCEPT that part of Government Lot 2, shown as Parcel 75 on Minnesota Department of Transportation Right of Way Plat No. 69-181, Section 18, Township 62 North, Range 20 West. new text end new text begin (d) The county has determined that the county's land management interests would best be served if the land was returned to private ownership to resolve a structure encroachment. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF LAND; ST. LOUIS COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the public sale and competitive bidding requirements of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 373, or other law to the contrary, St. Louis County may sell by private sale the county fee-owned lands described in paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) The lands to be sold are located in St. Louis County, Section 34, Township 51 North, Range 18 West, and are described as: new text end new text begin (1) Lots 1, 2, 3, 10, 11, and 12, Block B, including part of the vacated alley adjacent and including part of vacated 3rd Avenue adjacent, Brookston; new text end new text begin (2) Lots 4 thru 9, Block B, including part of the vacated alley adjacent, and including part of 3rd Street S adjacent to Lots 6 and 7, and including part of 3rd Avenue adjacent to Lots 4 thru 6 tool house, Brookston; and new text end new text begin (3) that part of the South Half of the Northeast Quarter lying southerly of the Brookston Plat and westerly of County State-Aid Highway 31. new text end new text begin (c) St. Louis County has determined that the county's interest would best be served if the lands were sold. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin PRIVATE CONVEYANCE OF SURPLUS LAND BORDERING PUBLIC WATER; WABASHA COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 92.45, 94.09, and 94.10, the commissioner of natural resources may convey by private sale the surplus land that is described in paragraph (c) to the city of Elgin for no consideration. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may make necessary changes to the legal description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land that may be conveyed is located in Wabasha County and is described as: new text end new text begin (1) OUTLOT A, OUTLOT B, and OUTLOT C of WHITEWATER WAY, according to the plat on file and of record in the Office of the County Recorder in and for Wabasha County, Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (2) that part of the West Half of the Northeast Quarter of Section 27, Township 108 North, Range 12 West, Wabasha County, Minnesota, described as follows: beginning at a point of intersection of the north line of the south 165.00 feet of the Northwest Quarter of the Northeast Quarter of said Section 27, with the east line of the West Half of the Northeast Quarter of said Section 27; thence on an assumed bearing of North 89 degrees 44 minutes 01 second West, along said north line of the south 165.00 feet, a distance of 250 feet, more or less, to the centerline of the North Fork of the White Water River; thence northeasterly along said centerline, to a point of intersection with the east line of the West Half of the Northeast Quarter of said Section 27; thence South 00 degrees 11 minutes 14 seconds East, along said east line to the point of beginning. new text end new text begin (d) The Department of Natural Resources has determined that the land is not needed for natural resource purposes and that the state's land management interests would best be served if the land was conveyed to and used by the city of Elgin for nonmotorized public recreation and public fishing access. new text end new text begin (e) The conveyance must provide that the lands revert to the state if the city of Elgin: new text end new text begin (1) fails to provide the public use intended on the property; new text end new text begin (2) without the written approval of the commissioner, allows a public use other than the public use agreed to by the commissioner at the time of conveyance; or new text end new text begin (3) abandons the public use of the property. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner must require that the city of Elgin reimburse the commissioner for all costs and expenses, including staff costs, incurred by the commissioner in making the property salable and in conveying the property. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin CONVEYANCE OF SURPLUS STATE LAND; WASHINGTON COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 16B.281 to 16B.298, or any other law to the contrary, upon approval by the Minnesota Historical Society's Executive Council, the director of the Minnesota Historical Society may convey to the city of Marine on Saint Croix, for no consideration, the surplus land and real property described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The Minnesota Historical Society may make necessary changes to the legal description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be conveyed is located in Washington County and is described as: that part of Block 47 of Marine, according to the recorded plat thereof, Washington County, Minnesota, described as follows: commencing at the southwest corner of said Block 47; thence North 24 degrees 18 minutes 37 seconds West, assumed bearing, along the westerly line of said Block 47, a distance of 98.35 feet, to the point of beginning of the tract of land to be described; thence continuing North 24 degrees 18 minutes 37 seconds West, along said westerly line of Block 47, a distance of 61.38 feet; thence North 66 degrees 16 minutes 53 seconds East, 89.81 feet; thence South 24 degrees 27 minutes 39 seconds East, 59.63 feet; thence South 65 degrees 09 minutes 47 seconds West, 89.96 feet, to the point of beginning. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin APPROPRIATION EXTENSION.new text end new text begin The appropriation in Laws 2024, chapter 116, article 1, section 3, subdivision 5, for an electronic licensing system is available until June 30, 2027. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 4 to 15 are effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: UES1943-2 85.536 GREATER MINNESOTA REGIONAL PARKS AND TRAILS COMMISSION. Subd. 3. First appointments. The governor shall make the first appointment by June 15, 2013. The governor shall designate six of the first appointees to terms ending on the first Monday in January 2015, and the remainder of the first appointees shall serve terms ending the first Monday in January 2016. Subd. 4. First meeting. The governor or the governor's designee shall convene the first meeting of the commission by July 15, 2013, and shall act as chair until the commission elects a chair. The commission shall elect a chair at its first meeting.